Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 1 Administration

3-2-1.
Powers and duties of commissioner generally; delegation of administrative duties.

The commissioner shall administer and enforce this title. The commissioner may designate employees of the department for the purpose of administering this title and may delegate to employees of the department any of the duties required of him pursuant to this title.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-301, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-2-2.
Promulgation of rules and regulations generally; forms.

The commissioner may make and publish in print or electronically reasonable rules and regulations not inconsistent with this title or other laws or the Constitution of this state or of the United States for the enforcement of this title and the collection of revenues under this title.

The commissioner shall prescribe the forms which he deems necessary in order to administer and enforce this title.

The authority granted to the commissioner pursuant to this Code section shall be exercised at all times in conformity with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

This Code section shall apply with respect to all rules and regulations promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to this title.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-302, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

Editor’s notes.

In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, annotations decided under from Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103 are included in the annotations for this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article suggesting the inclusion of alcoholic beverage regulation under the Georgia Administrative Procedure Act, in order to satisfy due process and equal protection requirements, see 1 Ga. St. B. J. 269 (1965).

3-2-3.
Powers and duties of commissioner as to denial, suspension, or cancellation of licenses or permits generally; promulgation of rules and regulations as to conversion of standards of measurement and labeling of distilled spirits.

In addition to his or her other duties and responsibilities to administer this title, the commissioner may:

Deny, suspend, or cancel any license or permit required under this title if:

The license application is not filed in good faith or is filed by some person as a subterfuge for any other person;

Any applicant for a license or permit or any licensee or permit holder under this title willfully fails to comply with any provisions of this title or with rules and regulations adopted by the commissioner; or

Any person to whom a license or permit has been issued is no longer engaged in the dealing of alcoholic beverages or no longer qualifies as a licensee or permit holder under this title.

Before any denial, suspension, or cancellation of a license or permit granted pursuant to this title, the applicant, licensee, or permit holder shall be afforded a hearing in the manner and subject to the conditions and procedures established by this chapter and the commissioner. The commissioner shall notify an applicant, licensee, or permit holder in writing of the denial, suspension, or cancellation by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the last known address of the applicant, licensee, or permit holder appearing in the commissioner’s files or by personal service upon the applicant, licensee, or permit holder by an authorized agent of the commissioner. Upon cancellation of a license or permit for cause under this paragraph, there shall be no renewal or reissuance of the canceled license or permit for a period of two years from the date of cancellation;

In the event that the license of any person is canceled by the commissioner under the authority of this title, hold the bonds of the person for a period of three years against any liabilities accruing as a result of the business of the person whose license is canceled. In no event shall the surrender of any bond release any liability;

Enter into agreements with appropriate authorities of other states who enforce the alcoholic beverage laws thereof, to exchange information relative to the manufacture, receipt, sale, use, or transportation of alcoholic beverages;

Promulgate rules and regulations which he or she deems necessary for the conversion from the metric system of measurement to the equivalent English measurement in United States gallons and subdivisions of gallons and shall compute all tax rates at the equivalent English measurement; and

Promulgate rules and regulations, not inconsistent with federal laws or regulations, requiring informative labeling of all distilled spirits offered for sale in this state.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-303, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 5; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1463, §§ 1, 8; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2015, p. 317, § 2/SB 63.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, annotations decided under former Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103 are included in the annotations for this Code section.

Law reviews.

For comment, “Retail Liquor Licenses and Due Process: The Creation of Property Through Regulation,” see 32 Emory L.J. 1199 (1983).

3-2-3.1.
Power of commissioner to permit importation of alcohol into counties and municipalities; taxation of such alcohol.

The commissioner, in accordance with such rules and regulations as he shall adopt, in his discretion may permit importation of distilled spirits and alcohol into any county or municipality where the manufacture and sale of the spirits or alcohol has been legalized. These rules and regulations shall provide for the collection of all taxes due on the distilled spirits or alcohol.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-303.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 6.

3-2-4.
Sale, distribution, or other dealing in alcoholic beverages by employees, agents, or officers of department prohibited; exemption.

No employee, agent, or officer of the department, directly or indirectly, shall have any interest whatsoever in manufacturing, selling, transporting, distributing, storing, or otherwise dealing in alcoholic beverages, except in the performance of his official duties.

The commissioner may provide by rule for the exemption of employees of the department from the provisions of this Code section so as to permit employment within the alcoholic beverage trade when such employment would pose no conflict of interest or interference with the performance by the employee of his duties as an employee of the department. This subsection shall not apply with respect to employees having responsibility for enforcement of this title.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-304, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-2-5.
Collection of taxes under title; issuance of licenses.

Except as otherwise specifically provided for in this title, the taxes provided for in this title shall be collected by the commissioner. Upon payment of the appropriate taxes and fees and compliance with all other requirements of this title, the commissioner shall issue appropriate licenses as provided for in this title.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-305, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-2-6.
Establishment and operation of reporting system for collection of taxes on malt beverages, distilled spirits, and wines; applicability to reporting system of provisions of law relating to revenue stamps.

With respect to malt beverages and wine, the commissioner shall provide, and with respect to distilled spirits, the commissioner may provide, by regulation, that the taxes on malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits shall be collected by a reporting system.

Pursuant to the establishment of a reporting system authorized by subsection (a) of this Code section, the commissioner may promulgate rules and regulations which shall include, but shall not be limited to, provisions for:

Records to be made and kept;

Penalties to be assessed for failure to comply with the reporting system;

Bonds or other security to be posted with the commissioner; and

Other matters relative to the administration and enforcement of collecting the tax under the reporting system.

In the event the commissioner prescribes a reporting system for collection of taxes imposed on distilled spirits by this title, all of the laws applicable to revenue stamps shall apply to the reporting system insofar as they can be made applicable.

There is established a reporting system for the collection of state excise taxes imposed by this title on all taxable wine. The reporting system shall be conducted as follows:

Every licensed wholesale dealer, importer, and broker located within this state shall file a monthly report with the commissioner, on forms prescribed by the commissioner, setting forth his taxable wine sales for the month and shall remit with the report the appropriate excise taxes on the wine. The reports and remittances shall be filed with the commissioner not later than the fifteenth day of the month next following the month of sale; and

Every licensed manufacturer, winery, producer, shipper, importer, and broker shipping wines or causing wines to be shipped into the state shall file a monthly report with the commissioner, on forms prescribed by the commissioner, which shall set forth the total quantity of wines shipped into the state during the month and which shall have attached to it legible copies of all invoices covering the shipments. The monthly reports shall be filed with the commissioner not later than the fifteenth day of the month next following the month of shipment.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-306, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, §§ 7, 8.

Cross references.

Procedures relating to excise taxation of cigars and cigarettes, T. 48, C. 11.

3-2-7.
Expiration and renewal of licenses generally; continuation of operations by licensee pending final approval or disapproval of application for renewal; penalty for late application for renewal; temporary permits.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection or elsewhere in this title, all licenses issued pursuant to this title shall expire on December 31 of each year and application for renewal shall be made annually on or before November 1.

On and after July 1, 2013, licenses for retailers and retail dealers shall be issued for a 12 month period to be determined by the commissioner and provided by regulation. Applications for renewal of licenses for retailers and retail dealers shall be made not less than 60 nor more than 90 days prior to expiration.

Any licensee making proper application, with all supporting documents, for a license to operate during the following year and having filed the application prior to the renewal date specified in subsection (a) of this Code section shall be permitted to continue to operate pending final approval or disapproval of the licensee’s application for the following year if final approval or disapproval is not granted prior to the day in which the license is set to expire. The effective date and the expiration date of the license shall be clearly marked on the license.

Any person holding any license issued pursuant to this title who fails to file a proper application for a similar license for the following year, with the proper fee accompanying the application, on or before the renewal date specified in subsection (a) of this Code section and who files an application after such date shall be required to pay, in addition to the license taxes imposed by this title, an additional amount equal to one-half the amount required for the license for which application is made.

Persons making initial applications for licenses issued pursuant to this title, after properly filing all required documents, including a valid local license, may be authorized by the commissioner to operate pursuant to a temporary permit which shall be issued under such regulations and in such form as the commissioner may deem appropriate. No right or property shall vest in any applicant by virtue of the issuance of such permit. The commissioner may impose a prelicense investigative fee upon persons making initial application for licenses issued pursuant to this title, which fee shall not exceed $100.00. No such fee shall be refundable.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-307, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 9; Ga. L. 2012, p. 827, § 1/HB 1066.

3-2-7.1.
State-wide centralized application process; uniformity; procedures; regulation.

On or before January 1, 2021, the department shall develop and implement a state-wide, centralized application process for initial applications and renewals for licenses and permits for retailers in order to provide for uniform and streamlined practices with respect to such application and renewal process that both the department and any local governing authority of any county or municipality that issues licenses or permits to retailers shall be required to use. Such process shall provide for such licenses and permits for retailers that may be issued by the department and by the governing authority of any county or municipality to be applied for and renewed online. The department in developing and implementing such process shall consider input from retailers, local governments, and the associations that represent them.

The department shall prescribe uniform procedures and forms for the initial application and renewal for licenses and permits for retailers to be used in the state-wide, centralized application process and shall provide for the local governing authority of any county or municipality to provide electronic forms to be added to such process for any additional information that is necessary in order to determine if a local license or local permit may be issued or renewed that such local governing authority demonstrates substantially differs from that requested through the procedures and forms developed by the department, such as, but not limited to, any distance requirements.

The state-wide, centralized application process shall ensure that any initial application or renewal is sent simultaneously upon completion to the department and the appropriate local governing authority; provided, however, that the department may require that a valid local license or permit be issued prior to granting a license or permit.

The state-wide, centralized application process shall provide for the remittance and reporting of all fees for initial applications and renewals for licenses and permits for retailers and may do so by requiring the applicant to pay the department and the local governing authorities of the county or municipality separately at the time the initial application or renewal is submitted.

The department shall administer the state-wide, centralized application process and shall provide access to the necessary authorized users.

The commissioner shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement and administer the provisions this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-2-7.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 615, § 1/HB 879.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective August 3, 2020.

3-2-8.
Availability of records for public inspection; collection of fee for special requests for preparation of information.

The commissioner shall make available for inspection by the public at reasonable times all records relating to alcoholic beverage brands, shipments, and sales by manufacturers, shippers, or wholesalers. The commissioner may charge a fee for special requests for prepared information, which fee shall be based upon the cost of preparation of the information.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-308, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 10.

3-2-9.
Requirements as to reports to be made to commissioner.

Any report made to the commissioner as prescribed in this title shall be made under oath and under such regulations as the commissioner shall prescribe.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-309, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-2-10.
Disposition of taxes, penalties, interest, and fees.

All taxes, penalties, interest, and fees collected by the commissioner pursuant to this title shall be remitted to the Office of the State Treasurer to the credit of the general fund of this state.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-310, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296.

3-2-11.
Penalties for failure to file reports or returns or to pay tax or fee; procedure for assessment of taxes due, penalties, and interest.

Except as otherwise provided in this title:

When any person required to file a report as provided by this title fails to file the report within the time prescribed, he shall be assessed a penalty of $50.00 for each failure to file.

In the event the commissioner determines, upon inspection of the invoices, books, and records of a licensed wholesale dealer or importer or from any other information obtained by him or his authorized agents, that the licensed wholesale dealer or importer has not paid the proper tax or the proper amount of taxes, the wholesale dealer or importer shall be assessed for the taxes due. After assessment, the person assessed shall be provided with notice and an opportunity for a hearing as provided for contested cases by Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

When any person fails to pay any tax or license fee due as provided by this title, the person shall be assessed a penalty the same as that provided for in Code Section 48-2-44.

When any person fails to file a return, files a false or fraudulent return, or when a tax deficiency or any part of a tax deficiency is due to a fraudulent intent to evade any tax imposed or authorized by this title, the person shall be assessed a specific penalty of 50 percent of the tax due.

When any person fails to pay the tax or any part of the tax due as provided by this title, the person shall pay interest on the unpaid tax at the rate of 1 percent per month from the time the tax became due until paid or at the rate specified in Code Section 48-2-40, whichever is greater. Interest shall be computed on a monthly basis for any portion of a month during which payment is delinquent.

All penalties and interest imposed by this title shall be payable to and collected by the commissioner in the same manner as if they were a part of the taxes imposed by this title.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-311, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-2-12.
Waiver of penalties by commissioner.

The commissioner may waive, in whole or in part, the collection of any amount due the state as a penalty under this title whenever, or to the extent that, he reasonably determines that the default giving rise to the penalty was due to reasonable cause and not due to gross or willful neglect or disregard of the law or of regulations or instructions pertaining to the law.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-312, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-2-13.
Issuance of refunds or credits for taxes paid.

The commissioner may issue credits for taxes paid by or due from a wholesaler when it is shown to the commissioner’s satisfaction that any of the following events has occurred:

Alcoholic beverages have been received by the wholesaler through an error in shipment and the alcoholic beverages are returned to the shipper prior to any sale by the wholesaler in this state;

Alcoholic beverages ordered by the wholesaler have been destroyed in transit prior to entry into the wholesaler’s warehouse or storage area;

Alcoholic beverages which are unfit for consumption upon receipt have been received by the wholesaler and the alcoholic beverages are returned to the shipper or destroyed prior to any sale by the wholesaler in this state;

Alcoholic beverages have been destroyed while in the possession of a wholesaler within the state by an act of God, such as fire, flood, lightning, wind, or other natural calamity;

Wines have been sold by the wholesaler for delivery and consumption outside the state, provided the sale and delivery shall in all respects comply with the requirements of Code Section 3-6-26.1; or

Taxes were paid under a statute expressly held to be unconstitutional by a court of last resort and the payments were made under protest and the ground of the protest was the same as the basis for the ruling of unconstitutionality by the court of last resort.

No person shall receive a credit for taxes paid in any case where an amount equal to the amount of taxes paid has been charged to or paid by any purchaser of the person seeking a refund or credit. When an applicant is issued a credit for taxes paid, in every case where an amount equal to the amount of taxes paid has been charged to or paid by any purchaser of the applicant, the applicant shall refund or credit to the purchaser or customer an amount equal to the credit allowed by the commissioner.

In the event that the commissioner issues a credit under this Code section to a person who has or will have insufficient tax liabilities to the State of Georgia against which to offset the credit, the commissioner shall issue a refund to such person for the unusable portion of the credit.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-313, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 11; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1458, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 83, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 206, § 3/HB 1248.

3-2-14.
Limitations on credit; application; action for recovery of credit; setoff of unpaid taxes against credit.

No credit for taxes paid on alcoholic beverages in payment of taxes on alcoholic beverages shall be allowed unless an application for credit is filed with the commissioner within 90 days from the date payment is received by the commissioner. If, in the opinion of the commissioner, an application for credit of taxes paid pursuant to this title contains a false statement, the application shall be denied. When an applicant is indebted to the state or an applicant is in violation of this title, the commissioner shall decline to approve the credit until the applicant has complied with the laws of this state. In no event shall interest be allowed on any refund or credit for taxes paid on alcoholic beverages. Nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed so as to allow for a credit or refund of any license fee lawfully due or paid under this title.

Each application for credit shall be filed in writing in the form and containing such information as the commissioner may reasonably require. The commissioner or his delegate shall consider information contained in the application, together with such other information as may be available, and shall approve or disapprove the application and notify the applicant of his action. Any applicant whose claim is denied by the commissioner or his delegate or whose claim is not decided by the commissioner or his delegate within one year from the date of filing the claim shall have the right to bring an action for a credit in the Superior Court of Fulton County. No action or proceeding for the recovery of a credit shall be commenced before the expiration of one year from the date of filing the application unless the commissioner or his delegate renders a decision on the application within that time, nor shall any action or proceeding be commenced after the occurrence of the earlier of (1) the expiration of one year from the date the claim is denied, or (2) the expiration of two years from the date the application was filed. The time for filing an action for the recovery of a credit may be extended for such period as may be agreed upon in writing between the applicant and the commissioner during the period authorized for bringing an action or any extension thereof. In the event any application is approved and the taxpayer has not paid other state taxes which have become due, the commissioner may set off the unpaid taxes against the credit. When the setoff authorized in this Code section is exercised, the credit shall be deemed granted and the amount of the setoff shall be considered for all purposes as a payment toward the particular tax debt which is being set off. Any excess credit properly allowable under this article which remains after the setoff has been applied may be credited to the taxpayer.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-314, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1458, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 206, § 4/HB 1248.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, “article” was substituted for “Article” in the last sentence of subsection (b).

3-2-15.
Promulgation of rules and regulations governing advertising of distilled spirits.

The commissioner shall issue rules and regulations governing all advertising of distilled spirits within this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 8; Code 1933, § 5A-315, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.